Utah statutes.
19-10-101.   Title -- Scope.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Environmental Institutional Control Act."

(2) (a)  This chapter applies to an environmental institutional control created before May 1, 2006.

(b)  Title 57, Chapter 25, Uniform Environmental Covenants Act, governs an environmental covenant created on or after May 1, 2006.

